Washington statutes.
RCW 36.88.240

Improvement bonds—Repayment restricted to special funds—Remedies of bond owner—Notice of restrictions.

The owner of any bond or warrant issued under the provisions of this chapter shall not have any claim therefor against the county by which the same is issued, except for payment from the special assessments made for the improvement for which said bond or warrant was issued and except as against the improvement guaranty fund of such county, and the county shall not be liable to any owner of such bond or warrant for any loss to the guaranty fund occurring in the lawful operation thereof by the county. The remedy of the owner of a bond, or warrant in case of nonpayment, shall be confined to the enforcement of any assessments made in such road improvement district and to the guaranty fund. In case the bonds are guaranteed in accordance herewith a copy of the foregoing part of this section shall be plainly written, printed or engraved on each bond issued and guaranteed hereunder.

[ 1983 c 167 s 97; 1963 c 4 s 36.88.240. Prior: 1951 c 192 s 24.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.